src/czhyphen1-patched.pat
.ag3cz
.ale3x
.as3t3
.at3l
.ats3t
.az3dá
.ch2
.ch3n
.cs3cz
.cyk3
.do3t
.do3wh
.dsm3
.dva3t
.eall3
.eju3
.ens3c
.en3us
.es3k
.es3t
.et3ø
.gi3sl
.hop3h
.htc3
.ib3r
.in3ea
.is3l
.køí3d
.mi3st
.mo3¹k
.moud3
.na3è
.ná3h
.ná3ta
.nb3i
.ne3c
.nk3b
.nos3t
.ns3le
.nto3
.ob3l
.ob3re
.ob3ø
.ode3
.od3rá
.os3lù
.os3t3r
.ot3rá
.ot3v
.oys3
.pa3tø
.pá3t
.pn3en
.po3è
.pu3b
.pý1
.re3s
.roze3
.ss3ma
.st2
.sv3ag
.¹e3t
.the3d
.uir3
.uk2
.us2
.ut2
.wi3cz
.yj2
.yp2
.za3b
.za3è
.za3g
.za3l
.za3m
.za3n
.za3r
.za3v
.zù1
.zù3s
a1a
aad2
aase3
aas3j
aa3t2
a1á
a1b
3abeg
ab3lík
abo3z
ab3ri
ab2u
a3by
ab2z
a1c
ac3lc
a2ct
acy2
a2èc
aèis3
a2èk
a1èl
a3èn.
aè3pl
aè3pø
a3ès.
a3ètì
a1èz
ad3ade
ad3be
aden3b
a1dé
3adhá
ad3lou
adm2
ad3mn
ad3out
1adq
a3d3ra
ad3re
ad3ri
a3dr¾
ad3øí
2adt
a3du
3a1dv
2adw
ad3wr
a1ï
a1e
ae1e
aeg3el
ae1i
ae3sc
2aeu
a1é
a1ë
af3ho
3afp
a2fr
a2gb
ag3bag
a2gc
a2gd
a2ge
a2gé
a2gf
a2gg
a2gh
ag3inb
a2gí
a2gj
a2gl
a2gó
a2gp
ag3ro
a2gø
2a2gs
a2g¹
a3gt
a2gù
a2gú
a2gü
a2g3v
a2gw
a2gy
a2g¾
a1h
aha3dr
aha3kø
aha3sl
aha3st
aha3¹
aha3z
ah3ip
ah3ne
a2hò
ah3v
ahy3b
ai1b2
a3icr
a2ie
aii1
a1in
aint3h
aint3m
ait3c
a1iv
a1í1
a1ja
a1já
a1jb
aj3chr
a1jé
a1jj
a1jò
a1j2o
aj3od
a1jó
a1jö
a1j¹
a3ju
aj3us
a1jù
a1jy
a3karl
a1ká
a2kb
a1ke
a1ké
2akg
2akh
a1ki
ak2m
a1ko
a1kó
ak1p
a1kr
ak3rob
3aksá
a1ku
a1ky
a1ký
a1la
al3ahr
al3aks
al3alb
al3att
al3awl
a1lá
a1le
ale3dr
3ale3xa
ale3xo
ale3xù
ale3xx
ale3xy
a1lì
a1lé
al3has
a1lí
a1lo
a1ló
a1lq
a1lr
a1lu
a1lú
a1lü
a1lw
a1lx
a3ly
al3yam
a1lý
a1m
3amarn
am3ham
am3lok
amo3s
amys3
am2¾
an3by
an3èch
and3c
3andd
3andré
an3eat
an3gt
a1nh
an3ifr
an3int
a1nj
a1nm
a1nö
a1np
a1nq
a1nr
an3ran
ant3c
an3tch
ant3m
a1n»
a1nú
a1nv
a1nw
an3wo
a1nx
an3yv
a2òs
a1o
aob3l
ao3pc
ao3sko
ao3sta
ao3ts
a1ó
a1p
apá3tr
ap3nt
a2pp
ap3rl
ap3t
a1q
1aqs
a1ra
a1rá
a2rb
a2rè
a1re
ar3ear
a1ri
ar3ir.
2arj
arl3f
a1ro
aro3sk
a1ró
2arp
ar3sk
ar3sl
ar3st
ar1¹2
a1ru
a1rù
arùs3
arv2
arx3l
a1ry
a1rý
a1øa
a1øá
a1øe
a1øi
a1øí
aø3pa
a1øu
a1sa
as3ase
a1sh
a3sin
as3int
as3kov
as3lag
as3lý
aso3uz
a3spel
as3pi
as3pod
as3rh
as3tìt
as3tv
a3ství
a1¹a
a1¹á
a1¹è
a1¹d
a1¹é
a1¹g
a1¹h
a¹3lí
a1¹ò
a1¹ó
a3¹pi
a1¹r
a1¹¹
a¹3tì
a1¹ù
a1¹v
a1¹y
a1ta
ata3s
a1tá
a1tì
a3ti
a1tí
at3loc
at3lok
at3ls
a3to
at3pt
a3tr
at3re.
at3rec
at3red
at3ree
at3rei
at3rej
at3rek
at3rel
at3rem
at3ren
at3reo
at3ret
at3rey
at3ro
at3øej
at3øi.
at3øiè
at3øí.
at3øíc
at3øík
at3øím
at3øín
at¹2
a1tu
a3tv
a1ty
a2»o
a2u1a
au3chb
a2ue
au3ea
au3ec
au3eh
au3el
au3em
au3en
au3es
a3uhø
au3il
au3ip
au3ir
a1uj2
a2uo
au3pr
aus3t
a2ut
1auy
a1ù1
aú2è
aú2h3
aú2s3
a1ü
2av
ava3tø
a2v1d
3avivu
av3lo
av3m
avo3z
a2v1t
a1w
awa3k
aw3hil
3awsa
a1x
axt2
ax3wi
2a1y
ay3asy
ayd3r
ay3eva
ay1m
ay3ng
ay3t
a1ý
a1z
a2zb
a2zc
a2zè
az2d
a2zf
3azíz
az2j
2a2z1k
a2zl
az3le
az3lí
az2p
a2zt
2azù
a2z2ú
az2v
az3zm
a1¾a
a1¾á
a1¾p
a2¾¹
a1¾ù
a1¾v
a1¾y
a1¾ý
äa2
ä1by
äe1
äg1r
ä1ke
ä1ki
ä1kl
äm2t
ä1nä
ä1nr
än2z
äo1
ä1pa
ä1pe
ä1ra
ärk2
ä1si
ä1tu
äu1c
äup1
ä1z
áa2g
á1áè
á1ba
á1b1b
á1be
á1bì
á1bh
áb3lí
áb3lý
á1bm
á3br
á1bø
á1bu
á1bù
á1by
á1bý
á3che
á3chr
á3chv
á1cp
ác3ti
á1èr
á1db
á1dé
ád3las
ád3lou
ád3lu
á1dm
á1dó
ád3re.
á1d1ø
á1dt
ádù2
á1dv
á1dz
á2fl
áf2r
áfu1
ág3lí
á2gn
águ1
á1ha
á1há
á1he
áh1l
á3hl.
áh3n
á1ho
á1hr
á1hø
áhy1
áí1
á1íh
á1j
ája1
áj2m
áj3me.
á1k
ák2m
ák3ò
á1la
á3lát
á3láz
á1le
á1lé
á1lí
ál3lu
á1lo
álo3k
ál3or
á1lu
á1lý
á1m
á2mh
á2mj
á2mm
á2m»
á1n
á2nd
á2nr
ánù1
á2nv
á2òu
á1oc
á1ol
á1on
á1p
áp3li
á2pn
áp1t
á1ra
á1re
á1ré
ár3kl
ár2m
á1ro
á1ru
á1rù
á1ry
á1øa
á1øá
á3øe
á1øi
á1øí
á1ør
áøsko3
á1øu
á1sa
á1sb
á1si
ás1k
ás2m
ás3me
ás3mu.
á1só
á1sp
á1sq
ás2s
á3ství
á1sz
á¹á2
á2¹i
á¹2l
á2¹o
á2¹u
á3tah
á3táè
áte3s
á1tì
át3f
á1tí
át1r
át¹2
át1t
á1tu
á1ty
á1»
á1u
áu2v
á2v2d
á2vt
á1zé
á1zg
á1zh
áz1k
áz3lé
áz3lí
á1z2m
á1zr
á1z2v
á1¾a
á1¾á
3ba.
bach3t
ba3jg
ba3ka
ba3kl
ba3kr
1bap
3based
bass3t
1bá
bá3sl
1bbá
b1bì
bb3lí
bb1w
2b1c
bcr1
b2ct
2b1è
b2èk
3bèz
b1d
2bdì
1bdí
bd3re
bd3ro
bd2v
be3ad
be3au
be3av.
be1b
beh2
be1i
be3jm
be3ku
bel3r
ben3am
ben3k
3benz
be3p
be3sb
be3sch
1be¹
be3tí
be3ure
be3urs
bez3
beze3
1bìh
1bìo
bì3ta
b2fr
bg1b
b1h
1bi
bi2b3
big3ip
bi3io
b3inf
bio3¹
bis1
bis3d
bis3e
bis3t
bi3¹v
bi3wi
1bí
b1j
2b1k
bk3el
bk2l
3bl.
b3lá.
b3láè
b3ld
b3lek
bler3r
b3le¾
1blì
b3lé.
b3léb
b3léc
b3léh
b3lék
b3lét
b3lév
b3léz
b3líø
3blk
1blm
1bln
b3lon
b3los
b1ló
b3lp
bl1r
2blú
b2ly
b1m
b3mi
bmw1
2b1n
b2np
b2nz
b1ò
b2òa
1bo
bo3bì
bob3re
3boc
3bo1i
boj3m
bo3mm
bono3
bo3sk
bou3s
1bój
1bór
1bóz
böh2
1böl
b1p
bpa3f
b2pp
b1qm
1br
b3rab
b3rac
b3raè
b3raf
b3rag
b3rap
b3ra»
b3raz
b3ra¾
1brb
1brc
b1rè
1brd
1brï
b3rev
b1rì
2bri
1brj
2brk
2brm
brno3s
bro3zl
b1rø
br3s
b3rub
brùs3
b1rú
b1rv
b3rý
b3r¾e
b3r¾í
b1øa
b3øe.
3bøev
b1øí
2b1s2
b2sb
bs3che
b2sn
b2ss
bs3tr
2b¹2
b1¹a
2b1t
b2tl
1b»
bu3a
bu2c
buï3a
bu3eh
bu3el
bu3em
bu3et
bu3hr
bu1i
1bum
bus3d
bus3pa
b2u2v
bùh1
bú2n
bú2t
b2vd
b2vt
bvy2
bx2
3by.
byd3lo
by3dn
by3nc
bys3
by3¹ka
by3¹ku
3bytu
bý1t
bz2
b1zl
b1zp
bz3r
b1zv
b1¾
1ca
cac2
cac3k
ca3kle
ca3klo
cal3al
3cap
1cá
c3bau
c3bsd
c1by3
2cc
c3ca
3ccd
c3che
3ccm
c3co
cd3ad
cd3au
c3dce
cd3ext
2cdp
cd3re
cd3ro
c1dv
1ce
ce3ad
ce3au
ce3bb
ce3br
ce3dz
ce1e
ce1i
ce3ku
celo3
ce3mla
c3emm
ce3sc
ce3slí
ce3¹an
ce2u3
ce3zv
cì2
1céi
c2fr
c3g
1cgo
cg1t
2ch.
1cha
1chá
3ch3br
ch3buc
3chcá
3chèt
3chec
3chee
3chef
3cheg
3cheh
3chei
3chek
3chemu
3chenb
3chenk
3chens
3cherb
3cherj
3cherm
3cherw
3chese
3chess
1chì
1ché
chh2
2ch1n
ch3nk
ch3nl
ch3nn
1chò
3cho
ch3rav
3chsm
1ch¹
2cht
ch3tv
3chu
1chú
3chvi
3chvy
3chvz
c1hx
1chy
1chý
1ci
cib2
ci3bl
cigo3
cilo3
cio3¹
ci1p
ci3sb
1cí
3cíno
c3jab
cju1
2c1k2
ckand3
c3kat
ck3ill
ck3ine
ck3inù
ck3li.
ck3mb
cko3b
cko3sp
cko3ur
c2kv
2cl
c3la
3clau
c3lel
cl3eva
c1lé
clip3i
c1lí
c1lx
c2ly
c1lý
c1ma
c3me
1cmr
cmv2
2c1n
c1ò
c2òa
1co
cob3l
c3ods
co1i
coj2
cok2
co3okm
co3okù
cot3m
có1
1cpì
1cpi
cp3ms
cp3oe
c1pø
c2pu3
c1rd
cr3hc
cr3p
crs1
cr1t
cs3b
c1si
c2sv
c2sy
c1¹v
2ct.
c2tì
cti3h
cti3s
cti3t
3ctné
3ctný
c3tv
c1tz
cu3a
cu3e
cu1h
cu1i
cuk3á
cuk3o
cuk3r
cuk3u
cuk3ý
cut3c
1cù
cù3z
1c2v
c3vip
c2x
cy2d
cy2f
cy2g
cy2h
cy2i
cyk3a
cyk3y
cy2l
cy2m
cy2o
cy2p
cy2r
cy2w
cý1
cz2d
c3ze
cz3is
cz3ka
cz2l
c1z2m
cz3nac
c1zó
c3zps
c1zr
cz3us
cz2v
c1¾v
1èa
èa3dr
èa3kl
èa3kr
èas3tì
èat3l
èa3uè
1èá
2èb
è1bì
è1by
è1c
3èchu
è3ci
è1è
è2èc
è2èk
è3ès
è1d
1èe
3èe.
èe3chi
èe3chù
èe3cu
èe1i
èe3jon
èe3ku
èe3sc
èes3k
èf1t
1èi
èid2
èis3k
èis3tì
èi¹1
èiu2
1èí
èís3l
è1k
èk2c
è3ks
è2kv
è2ly
è1ma
1èmá
è1mì
è1mé
è1mí
è3mu
è1my
1è1m¾
2è1n
è2ne
ènì3s
ènì3t
è3ni
è3ný
è1ò
1èo
èong3
èo3sk
èo3¹ka
èo3¹ká
èp2c
èpo1
è1ra
èr3ra
1èrt
è1r1u
2èø
2è1s
è2sa
èse1
è2sf
è2sh
è3sl
è2sn
ès3nm
è2sp
è2ss
è2sv
è2sz
ès3zm
1è2ta
è1tì
2è1tí
1ètl
è2to
1ètr
3ètv
è1»a
1èu
èu1a
èu3ka
èu2v
1èù
è3va
èv2è
1èvr
èzá1
èz1k
1da
da3d
da3kr
d3amat
dar3ob
da3tho
dat3l
1dá
d2bá
d1bb
d1bd
d1bì
d1bé
d1bf
d1bh
d1bl
d1bm
d3bn
d1bö
d1bp
d1br
d1bø
d1bu
d1bx
d1by
d1bý
2d1c
dch2
3dchn
d2ct
2d1è
d2èk
d2èm
d1d
dd3f
dd3la
dd3re
dd2ø
d3du
dd2v
dd3wr
1de
de1a
de3ad
de3bb
de3br
de3ète
de3èto
de3ètu
de3dn
de3dø
3dee
de3et
3def
3deg
de3hn
de1i
de3jd
de3kl
de3ku
de3kv
de3mè
de3mlo
de3mw
deo3¹
de3r¹
de3sb
de3sc.
de3sch
de3ské
de3ský
de3sl
de3sní
de3stl
de3str
de3stv
de3tí
de1u
de3vk
de3xa
de3xc
de3xe
de3xi
de3xí
de3xo
de3xp
de3xr
de3xù
de3xx
de3xy
dez3ad
dez3en
dez3id
dez3in
de3zn
dez3o
1dì
3dìj
2dìz
1d2fr
d3ga
d3gi
2d3gí
d3gr
2dgs
dgu1
2d3gw
2d1h
d2h2n
1di
di3bb
di3bl
di1p
dis3k
di3sla
d3ivl
di3way
1dí
dí1z
d1j
djis3
d2jp
2d1k
dk2l
dkú3
1d1l
3dl.
d3la¾
d1lä
d3leas
d3lend
d1lì
2d1lé
d3li
2d1lí
2dll
2dlm
1dln
3dlot
d3lou.
dl1r
d2lu
d3luè
d2lù
d1lý
d1m
1dmd
d3mi
1dmn
dm3nì
2d1n
d3na
dni3s
dnu3d
d2nz
2d1ò
d2òa
1do
do3bì
dob3le
dob3r¾
do1è2
do3d
doe2
do1i
do3mm
do3mn
do3p
do3s
3dose
do3¹
do3tc
do3tf
do3tn
do3ts
do3tt
do3uè
d3oue
do3uk
do1z2
d1p
d2pp1
1dr
d3rá.
3dráb
3drád
3dráp
drd2
dre3e
d3rep
d1ré
d3riè
1drí
3drobn
d3rof
d3roo
d3ros
dro3sk
d3ro¹
d3rou
d3ro¾
dr1r
dr3sl
d3ru¹
drùs3
d3ryk
d1rý
d1øa
d3øit
d2øù
2d1s2
ds3bu
ds3ce
d2sè
ds3ds
dse3s
d2sf
d3sk
ds3max
d2sn
ds3pl
ds3pos
d2ss
d3st
ds3tm
ds3up
2d1¹2
d2¹l
d2¹»
d¹3»o
d¹u2
d1t
1dtf
dt3ja
d2tm
dts3e
d2t¹
dt1t
2d1»
1du
du3ak
du3an
du3ar
du3as
du3chs
du3chv
du1e
du3hr
du3id
du3il
du3is
du3it
dul3j
dum3ø
du1p
du3pk
d3upy
2dur
du3si
du2v
1dù1
3dù.
2dùb
dù2ø
dú2è
dú2n
dv2
dv3av
2dvá
d3vè
dvì3tø
dv3k
2dvl
d2vp
dv3pa
dvr3m
dvrst3
d3vs
2d2vu
d3vy
2dvý1
1dy
dyd3l
dy1t
dyto3
d1yu
1dý
d1z2
d2zk
dz3ka
d3zn
dz3no
d2zp
d2zt
d2¾2
1d¾m
1ïa
ïa2g
ï1c
ïe1k
ïì1
ïí1
ï1k
ï1m
ï2mì
ï2no
1ïo
ïo2d
ïs2
ï1si
2ï1t
3ïuj
ïú1
ï1¾
e1aa
e1ab
e1ac
e1aè
ead3at
ea3dr
ead3up
e1ae
e1af
e1ag
e1ah
e1ai
e1ak
ea3kl
ea3kr
eak3up
e1al
e1am
e1an
eana3f
ean3be
ean3c
e1ao
e1ap
e1aq
e2ar
e1as
eas3s
e1at
eat3re
ea3uè
eau3p
e1aw
e1ax
e1az
e1á
e1ba
e1bä
eb3ba
e1be
e1bì
e1bé
e1bj
e1b2l
eb3lík
eb3lù
eb3lý
e1bö
e3brí
e3bru
e3br¾
e2bø
e1bu
e3bù
e1bú
e1bv
e1by
e1bý
eb2z
3ecc.
e3che
e3chí
e3chl.
ech3tf
ech3us
e3chv
eck3up
ec3led
eco3sc
ec3pr
e3croi
ec1ø
ec3sy
ecú2
e3czec
eèis3
e3èt.
e3ètù
edè2
ede3f
e1dé
ed3l
edo3jm
edo3t
edo3wa
ed3re
e3drob
ed3uv
e3ïáb
e1ïu
e1ea
ee3au
e1eb
ee3br
ee3bw
e1ec
e1eè
e1ed
e1ee
ee3et
e3ef
e1eg
e1eh
e1e1i
e1ej
ee3ju
e3ek
ee3ku
e1el
e1em
e1en
e1eo
e1ep
e1eq
eer3r
e1eø
e1es
ee3sb
ee3sc
e1e¹
e1eu
e1eù
e1ev
e1ew
e1ex
ee3xi
e1ey
e1ez
ee3zr
efor3a
e2fr
1ef¹
ef3tra
eg3if
eg3lí
e2gn
e1ha
e1há
e1he
e3him
eh3lo
eh3ne
eh3nh
e1ho
e1hr
eh1t
e1hu
eh3ve
e1hy
e1hý
e1iá
ei3bb
ei3bl
eich3r
e1ie
e1if
e1ii
e1ij
e1ik
eilus3
e1im
e1iò
e3ió
e1ir
e1iù
e1iv
e1iw
ej3ag
ej3ele
ej3in
e3jmu
ej3oa
ej3oc
ej3of
ej3om
ej3on
ej3oo
ej3op
ej3or.
ej3ori
ej3o¹
ej3ot
ej3ou
ej3ow
ej3oy
ej3o¾
ej1u
eju3st
e2jw
e3ka
e1ká
ek1d
ek3dr
e1ke
e1ké
ekh2
ek2m
e3ko
eko3¹
e1kó
ek1p
e1kr
e3kvi
e1ky
e1la
e1lá
elb2
e1le
e1lé
e1lí
ell3k
elm3p
e1lo
el3res
els3ed
e1lu
e1lý
e1ma
3emae
e1má
em3cl
e3me.
e1mì
e1mí
e3ml.
e3mlá
e3mlù
em3mí
emo3k
e1mr
emre3
e1mø
ems3c
e3mù
e1my
emys3
ene3u
e1nh
en3hur
e1nj
en3kc
en3kvì
e1nm
e1nö
e1np
e1nq
e1nr
e1nø
en3ss.
ent3r
e1n»
e1nú
e1nv
e1nw
e1nx
en3xc
e1òá
e1o
eob3ø
eoch3r
eo1i
eo1j
eok2
eon3au
eon3on
eon3r
e2oo
eo3sc
eo3sk
eo3sm
eo3sp
eos3tì
eo3sý
eo3sz
eo¹e3
eo3¹ka
eo1z
eó1
e1ón
e1p
epa3t
epá3t
epìs3
ep3lí
ep3lo
epoè3t
e2pp
epp3ed
epøe3p
ep3øk
ep3up.
epy3
2er
e1ra
er3act
er3agu
er3aid
er3akc
er3akè
er3are
e1rá
e1re
e3reg
er3esc
er3exc
e1ré
e1ri
eri3g
er3ip.
er3nn
e1ro
ero3sk
er1s
er3st
e1ru
er3ups
er3u¾
e1rù
erùs3
er3wil
e1ry
e1rý
e1ø
e2øè
e1sa
es3alp
e3sca
es3che
e3sco
e3scr
e3scz
e1sd
e3sem
ese3s
e1sg
e1sh
e1si
e1sj
es3kab
e3skd
es3ké
es3kí
es3ku.
es3kú
es3ky
es3li.
es3liè
es3lid
es3lin
es3lit
e1s2m
es3me.
e1sp
es3puj
e1sq
ess3be
es3tán
est3ch
es3tìn
e3ství
e1sw
e1sx
e1sý
e1sz
e1s¾
e1¹é
e1¹2l
e¹3tì
e3¹tk
e3¹tv
e2¹u
e2¹ù
e1ta
e1tá
et3chb
et3che
et3chi
et3chk
et3chm
et3chp
et3ct
e1td
e1tì
e1th
e3tí.
e3tíè
e3tíh
e3tík
e3tír
e3tít
e1tj
et3kl.
e1tò
e1tö
e1tr
et3rec
et3rem
et3ri
et3ro
et3rù
et3øi
et3øís
et3øí¹
et3th
e1tu
etu3sc
e1t2ú
e1tv
e1tw
e1tx
e1ty
e1tz
e1t¾
e1»
eu1
e1ua
e1u3b
e1uc
e1uè
e2u3d
e1ug
e1uh
e1ui
e1uí
e1uj
e3u3k2
e1ul2
e1u3m
e1u3n
e1uo
e3u3p
e1uq
e3urá
e3urb
e3urc
eu3rn
e3urr
eu3r3s
eu3rt
e3uru
e3urv
e3ury
e1uø
e1us2
e1u¹
e1ut
eu3tc
eu3tk
eu3tl
eu3tm
eu3tn
eu3tt
e1uv
e1uw
e1ux
e1uy
e1u3z
e3u¾
eù1
eú1
eú2k
eú2¾
e3v2d
e3ven
ev2k
ev2¹
ev3¹tí
evý1
e3wam
e3waz
ew3eu
ewit3c
e3wra
3exup
ey3c
3eyep
ey2o
ey3on
ey3sl
ey1t
ez3akt
ezaos3
ez3de
e3ze
eze3d
eze3j
eze3l
ez3emb
ez3én
ez2h
ez3hn
ez3ilu
ez3ir.
e1z2j
ez3mu
ezo3s
e1zó
ez3pov
ez3rec
e1zø
ezù1
e3zvá
e3zvu
e3zvy
e1¾a
e1¾á
e1¾è
e1¾l
e1¾ó
e1¾ù
e1¾v
ì1ad
ì3akt
ì3aku
ì1an
ì1bì
ì1bl
ì3buf
ì3bys
ì1c
ì2cm
ì2ct
ì1dé
ìd3lou
ìd1r
ìd3øí
ì1e1
ì2e2c
ì2em
ì2fr
ìgu2
ì1ha
ì1he
ì3hl.
ìh3lí
ìh3lo
ì1ho
ì1hu
ì1hù
ì1in
ì1iv
ì1ja
ìji3s
ì1jo
ìj3us
ì1jù
ì1ka
ì1ká
ì1kd
ì1ke
ì1kì
ì1ké
ì1kh
ì1ki
ì1kj
ì3klá
ì3klou
ì3klý
ì1kò
ì1ko
ì1k1p
ì1kr
ì1kø
ìk1s
ì1k¹
ì3k2t
ì1ku
ì1kv
ì1ky
ì1ký
ì1kz
ì1l
ìlis3
ì2lj
ìl1l
ì1ma
ìma3t
ì3mìs
ìm2¾
ì1n
ìna1
ì2nd
ì2ng
ì1ò
ì2òa
ì3ob1
ì1or
ìo2s
ì1p
ì2pn
ì1ra
ìra3d
ì1re
ì1ré
ì1ro
ìr1s2
ì1ru
ìru3s
ì1rù
ì1ry
ì1rý
ì1ø
ìø1t
ì1si
ìs1k
ì3spo
ì3star
ìs3tìn
ìs3tìt
ì3ství
ìsu1
ì2sy
ì1¹á
ì¹3tì
ì¹3»
ì1¹v
ìta3
ìt3aè.
ìt3aèe
ìt3aèi
ìt3aèù
ìt3ah
ìt3akt
ìt3al
ì3tan
ìt3ane
ìt3as
ìt3at.
ì1tì
ì3tí.
ì3tík
ì3tí¹
ì3tít
ìt1l
ì3tr
ìt3ra
ì3tøeb
ìt3øí
ìtu3s
ìt3v
ì1ty
ìu1
ì1u2¾
ìv3è
ì2vì
ì2vi
ì3vin
ì3viz
ì2v¹
ì2vù
ì2vy
ì2za
ìz3ka
ìz3n
ì2zù
ìz2v
é1
éai2
éat3r
é2ct
écu1
é2èc
é2èk
é2èt
é2da
é2dá
é2de
